Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.1919

Surplus personal property—Sale, exchange—Exceptions and limitations—Transferring ownership of department-owned vessel.

(1) The department shall sell or exchange personal property belonging to the state for which the agency, office, department, or educational institution having custody thereof has no further use, at public or private sale, and cause the moneys realized from the sale of any such property to be paid into the fund from which such property was purchased or, if such fund no longer exists, into the state general fund. This requirement is subject to the following exceptions and limitations:

(a) This section does not apply to property under RCW 27.53.045, 28A.335.180, or 43.19.1920;

(b) Sales of capital assets may be made by the department and a credit established for future purchases of capital items as provided for in chapter 39.26 RCW;

(c) Personal property, excess to a state agency, including educational institutions, shall not be sold or disposed of prior to reasonable efforts by the department to determine if other state agencies have a requirement for such personal property. Such determination shall follow sufficient notice to all state agencies to allow adequate time for them to make their needs known. Surplus items may be disposed of without prior notification to state agencies if it is determined by the director to be in the best interest of the state. The department shall maintain a record of disposed surplus property, including date and method of disposal, identity of any recipient, and approximate value of the property;

(d) This section does not apply to personal property acquired by a state organization under federal grants and contracts if in conflict with special title provisions contained in such grants or contracts;

(e) A state agency having a surplus personal property asset with a fair market value of less than five hundred dollars may transfer the asset to another state agency without charging fair market value. A state agency conducting this action must maintain adequate records to comply with agency inventory procedures and state audit requirements.

(2)(a) Prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel, the department shall conduct a thorough review of the physical condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.

(b) If the department determines that the vessel is in a state of advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination, the department may: (i) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (ii) permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other related method.

[ 2015 c 79 s 12; 2013 c 291 s 5; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 215; 2000 c 183 s 1; 1997 c 264 s 2; (1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 513 expired June 30, 1997); 1991 c 216 s 2; 1989 c 144 s 1; 1988 c 124 s 8; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 11; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1919. Prior: 1959 c 178 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Expiration date—1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 ss 511-523, 528-533: "Sections 511 through 523 and 528 through 533 of this act expire June 30, 1997." [ 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 536.]

Effective dates—1995 2nd sp.s. c 14: "(1) Except for sections 514 through 524 and 539 through 556 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995.

(2) Sections 514 through 524 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1996." [ 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 562.]

Severability—1995 2nd sp.s. c 14: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 561.]

Findings—1991 c 216: "The legislature finds that (1) there are an increasing number of persons who are unable to meet their basic needs relating to shelter, clothing, and nourishment; (2) there are many nonprofit organizations and units of local government that provide shelter and other assistance to these persons but that these organizations are finding it difficult to meet the increasing demand for such assistance; and (3) the numerous agencies and institutions of state government generate a significant quantity of surplus, tangible personal property that would be of great assistance to homeless persons throughout the state. Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the state to provide for the donation of state-owned, surplus, tangible property to assist the homeless in meeting their basic needs." [ 1991 c 216 s 1.]

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.